Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.123

On-site parole or community custody revocation or violations hearings—Conduct—Witnesses—Subpoenas, enforcement.

In conducting on-site parole hearings or community custody revocation or violations hearings, the board shall have the authority to administer oaths and affirmations, examine witnesses, receive evidence, and issue subpoenas for the compulsory attendance of witnesses and the production of evidence for presentation at such hearings. Subpoenas issued by the board shall be effective throughout the state. Witnesses in attendance at any on-site parole or community custody revocation hearing shall be paid the same fees and allowances, in the same manner and under the same conditions as provided for witnesses in the courts of the state in accordance with chapter 2.40 RCW. If any person fails or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by the board, or obeys the subpoena but refuses to testify concerning any matter under examination at the hearing, the board may petition the superior court of the county where the hearing is being conducted for enforcement of the subpoena: PROVIDED, That an offer to pay statutory fees and mileage has been made to the witness at the time of the service of the subpoena. The petition shall be accompanied by a copy of the subpoena and proof of service, and shall set forth in what specific manner the subpoena has not been complied with, and shall ask an order of the court to compel the witness to appear and testify before the board. The court, upon such petition, shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court at a time and place to be fixed in such order and then and there to show cause why he or she has not responded to the subpoena or has refused to testify. A copy of the order shall be served upon the witness. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was properly issued and that the particular questions which the witness refuses to answer are reasonable and relevant, the court shall enter an order that the witness appear at the time and place fixed in the order and testify or produce the required papers, and on failing to obey the order, the witness shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.

[ 2008 c 231 s 43; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 336; 1999 c 143 s 24; 1969 c 98 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Application—Application of repealers—Effective date—2008 c 231: See notes following RCW 9.94A.701.

Severability—2008 c 231: See note following RCW 9.94A.500.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Severability—Effective date—1969 c 98: See notes following RCW 9.95.120.